Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 86.
[GENERAL ASSEMBLY SESSIONS] (CONST., ART. 5, §§ 5, 17, 29, 34, 39, 40 AND AMEND. 35, § 7, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 5, §§ 5, 17, 29, 34, 39, 40, and Ark. Const. Amend. 35, § 7. The amendments to those sections are incorporated within those sections. The amendment was proposed by H.J.R. 1004 during the 2007 Regular Session and adopted at the 2008 general election by a vote of 664,671 for and 292,436 against.

Ark. Const. Amend. 86, § 8, provided: “Nothing in this amendment shall be construed to alter the Governor’s authority to call a special session of the General Assembly.”

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 86, § 9:
Jan. 1, 2009.